Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 1.3 Expungement of Criminal Records

12-1.3-1.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter only, the following definitions apply:

“Crime of violence” includes murder, manslaughter, first degree arson, kidnapping with intent to extort, robbery, larceny from the person, first degree sexual assault, second degree sexual assault, first and second degree child molestation, assault with intent to murder, assault with intent to rob, assault with intent to commit first degree sexual assault, burglary, and entering a dwelling house with intent to commit murder, robbery, sexual assault, or larceny.

“Expungement of records and records of conviction” means the sealing and retention of all records of a conviction and/or probation and the removal from active files of all records and information relating to conviction and/or probation.

“First offender” means a person who has been convicted of a felony offense or a misdemeanor offense, and who has not been previously convicted of or placed on probation for a felony or a misdemeanor and against whom there is no criminal proceeding pending in any court.

“Law enforcement agency” means a state police organization of this or any other state, the enforcement division of the department of environmental management, the office of the state fire marshal, the capitol police, a law enforcement agency of the federal government, and any agency, department, or bureau of the United States government which has as one of its functions the gathering of intelligence data.

“Records” and “records of conviction and/or probation” include all court records, all records in the possession of any state or local police department, the bureau of criminal identification and the probation department, including, but not limited to, any fingerprints, photographs, physical measurements, or other records of identification. The terms “records” and “records of conviction, and/or probation” do not include the records and files of the department of attorney general which are not kept by the bureau of criminal identification in the ordinary course of the bureau’s business.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 224, § 3; P.L. 1984, ch. 341, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 153, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 28, § 4.

12-1.3-2.
Motion for expungement.

Any person who is a first offender may file a motion for the expungement of all records and records of conviction for a felony or misdemeanor by filing a motion in the court in which the conviction took place; provided, that no person who has been convicted of a crime of violence shall have his or her records and records of conviction expunged; and provided, that all outstanding court-imposed or court-related fees, fines, costs, assessments, charges, and/or any other monetary obligations have been paid, unless such amounts are reduced or waived by order of the court.

Notwithstanding §

12-1.3-1(3)

(“first offender”), any person who has been convicted of more than one misdemeanor, but fewer than six (6) misdemeanors, and has not been convicted of a felony may file a motion for the expungement of any or all of those misdemeanors by filing a motion in the court in which the convictions took place; provided that convictions for offenses under chapter 29 of title 12, §

31-27-2

or §

31-27-2

.1 are not eligible for and may not be expunged under this subsection.

Subject to subsection (a), a person may file a motion for the expungement of records relating to a misdemeanor conviction after five (5) years from the date of the completion of his or her sentence.

Subject to subsection (a), a person may file a motion for the expungement of records relating to a felony conviction after ten (10) years from the date of the completion of his or her sentence.

Subject to §

12-19-19(c)

, and without regard to subsections (a) through (c) of this section, a person may file a motion for the expungement of records relating to a deferred sentence upon its completion, after which the court will hold a hearing on the motion.

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, a person may file a motion for the expungement of records relating to misdemeanor convictions after ten (10) years from the date of the completion of their last sentence.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) through (f) of this section, a person may file a motion for the expungement of records related to an offense that has been decriminalized subsequent to the date of their conviction, after which the court will hold a hearing on the motion in the court in which the original conviction took place.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 224, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 638, § 3; P.L. 1993, ch. 153, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 97, § 3; P.L. 2015, ch. 109, § 3; P.L. 2016, ch. 202, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 234, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 247, § 1.

12-1.3-3.
Motion for expungement — Notice — Hearing — Criteria for granting.

Any person filing a motion for expungement of the records of his or her conviction pursuant to §

12-1.3-2

shall give notice of the hearing date set by the court to the department of the attorney general and the police department that originally brought the charge against the person at least ten (10) days prior to that date.

The court, after the hearing at which all relevant testimony and information shall be considered, may, in its discretion, order the expungement of the records of conviction of the person filing the motion if it finds:

That in the five (5) years preceding the filing of the motion, if the conviction was for a misdemeanor, or in the ten (10) years preceding the filing of the motion, if the conviction was for a felony, the petitioner has not been convicted nor arrested for any felony or misdemeanor; there are no criminal proceedings pending against the person; that the person does not owe any outstanding court-imposed or court-related fees, fines, costs, assessments, or charges, unless such amounts are reduced or waived by order of the court; and he or she has exhibited good moral character;

That after a hearing held under the provisions of §

12-19-19(c)

, the court finds that the person has complied with all of the terms and conditions of the deferral agreement including, but not limited to, the payment in full of any court-ordered fines, fees, costs, assessments, and restitution to victims of crimes; there are no criminal proceedings pending against the person; and he or she has established good moral character. Provided, that no person who has been convicted of a crime of violence shall have their records relating to a deferred sentence expunged; or

Subject only to §§

12-1.3-2(b)

and (f), that in the ten (10) years preceding the filing of the motion, if the convictions were for multiple misdemeanors, the petitioner has not been convicted nor arrested for any felony or misdemeanor; there are no criminal proceedings pending against the person; and they have exhibited good moral character; and, provided that convictions for offenses under chapter 29 of title 12, §

31-27-2

or §

31-27-2

.1 are not eligible and may not be expunged under this subsection.

That the petitioner’s rehabilitation has been attained to the court’s satisfaction and the expungement of the records of his or her conviction is consistent with the public interest.

If the court grants the motion, it shall order all records and records of conviction relating to the conviction expunged and all index and other references to it removed from public inspection. A copy of the order of the court shall be sent to any law enforcement agency and other agency known by either the petitioner, the department of the attorney general, or the court to have possession of the records. Compliance with the order shall be according to the terms specified by the court.

The defendant shall be advised at the hearing that any and all bail money relating to a case that remains on deposit and is not claimed at the time of expungement shall be escheated to the state’s general treasury in accordance with chapter 12 of title 8.

In cases of expungement sought pursuant to §

12-1.3-2(g)

, the court shall, after a hearing at which it finds that all conditions of the original criminal sentence have been completed, and any and all fines, fees, and costs related to the conviction have been paid in full, order the expungement without cost to the petitioner. At the hearing, the court may require the petitioner to demonstrate that the prior criminal conviction would qualify as a decriminalized offense under current law. The demonstration may include, but is not limited to, an affidavit signed by the petitioner attesting to the fact that the prior conviction qualifies as a decriminalized offense under current Rhode Island law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 224, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 638, § 3; P.L. 1993, ch. 153, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 11, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 97, § 3; P.L. 2015, ch. 109, § 3; P.L. 2016, ch. 202, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 234, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 247, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 141, § 2, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 142, § 2, effective July 3, 2021.

12-1.3-4.
Effect of expungement of records — Access to expunged records — Wrongful disclosure.

Any person having his or her record expunged shall be released from all penalties and disabilities resulting from the crime of which he or she had been convicted, except, upon conviction of any subsequent crime, the expunged conviction may be considered as a prior conviction in determining the sentence to be imposed.

In any application for employment, license, or other civil right or privilege, or any appearance as a witness, a person whose conviction of a crime has been expunged pursuant to this chapter may state that he or she has never been convicted of the crime; provided, that if the person is an applicant for a law enforcement agency position, for admission to the bar of any court, an applicant for a teaching certificate, under chapter 11 of title 16, a coaching certificate under §

16-11.1-1

, or the operator or employee of an early childhood education facility pursuant to chapter 48.1 of title 16, the person shall disclose the fact of a conviction.

Whenever the records of any conviction and/or probation of an individual for the commission of a crime have been expunged under the provisions of this chapter, any custodian of the records of conviction relating to that crime shall not disclose the existence of the records upon inquiry from any source unless the inquiry is that of the individual whose record was expunged, that of a sentencing court following the conviction of the individual for the commission of a crime, or that of a bar admission, character and fitness, or disciplinary committee, board, or agency, or court which is considering a bar admission, character and fitness, or disciplinary matter, or that of the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, or that of any law enforcement agency when the nature and character of the offense with which an individual is to be charged would be affected by virtue of the person having been previously convicted of the same offense.

The custodian of any records which have been expunged pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall only release or allow access to those records for the purposes specified in subsections (b) or (c) of this section or by order of a court. Any agency and/or person who willfully refuses to carry out the expungement of the records of conviction pursuant to §

12-1.3-2

, or this section or willfully releases or willfully allows access to records of conviction, knowing them to have been expunged, shall be civilly liable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 224, § 3; P.L. 1984, ch. 341, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 198, § 7; P.L. 1990, ch. 249, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 153, § 2.

12-1.3-5.
Expungement of marijuana records.

Any person with a prior civil violation, misdemeanor or felony conviction for possession only of a marijuana offense that has been decriminalized subsequent to the date of conviction shall be entitled to have the civil violation or criminal conviction automatically expunged, notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 1.3 of title 12. For purposes of this section, “conviction” means, in addition to judgments of conviction entered by a court subsequent to a finding of guilty, or plea of guilty, those instances where the defendant has entered a plea of nolo contendere and has received a jail sentence or a suspended jail sentence, or those instances wherein the defendant has entered into a deferred sentence agreement with the Rhode Island attorney general and the period of deferment has not been completed.

Records shall be expunged pursuant to procedures and a timeline to be determined by the chief justice; provided however, that all eligible records shall be expunged before July 1, 2024.

The chief justice may provide for an expedited procedure for expungement of a prior misdemeanor or felony conviction for possession only of a marijuana offense that has been decriminalized subsequent to the date of conviction. Any such expedited procedure shall require a written request by the person requesting expungement, and any expedited expungement shall be granted in accordance with a timeline to be determined by the chief justice.

If the amount of marijuana is not stated in the record of conviction or any related record, report or document, then the court shall presume the amount to have been two ounces (2 oz.) or less.

Any person who has been incarcerated for misdemeanor or felony possession of marijuana shall have all court costs waived with respect to expungement of his or her criminal record under this section.

If the court determines a record is to be expunged in accordance with the provisions of this section, it shall order all records and records of conviction or civil adjudication relating to the conviction or civil adjudication expunged and all index and other references to it removed from public inspection. Within a reasonable time, the court shall send a copy of the order to the department of the attorney general, the police department that originally brought the charge against the person, and any other agency known by the petitioner to have possession of the records of conviction or adjudication.

Eligible expungement of convictions and civil adjudications pursuant to this section shall be granted notwithstanding the existence of:

Prior arrests, convictions, or civil adjudications including convictions for crimes of violence as defined by §

12-1.3-1

;

Pending criminal proceedings; and

Outstanding court-imposed or court-related fees, fines, costs, assessments or charges. Any outstanding fees, fines, costs, assessments or charges related to the eligible conviction or civil adjudication shall be waived.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict or modify a person’s right to have their records expunged, except as otherwise may be provided in this chapter, or diminish or abrogate any rights or remedies otherwise available to the individual.

The existence of convictions in other counts within the same case that are not eligible for expungement pursuant to this section or other applicable laws shall not prevent any conviction otherwise eligible for expungement under this section from being expunged pursuant to this section. In such circumstances, the court shall make clear in its order what counts are expunged and what counts are not expunged and/or remain convictions. In such circumstances, notwithstanding subsection (e) of this section, any expungement pursuant to this subsection shall not affect the records related to any count or conviction in the same case that are not eligible for expungement.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the court or any other private or public agency to reimburse any petitioner for fines, fees, and costs previously incurred, paid or collected in association with the eligible conviction or civil adjudication.

Any conviction or civil adjudication ordered expunged pursuant to this section shall not be considered as a prior conviction or civil adjudication when determining the sentence to be imposed for any subsequent crime or civil violation.

In any application for employment, license, or other civil right or privilege, or any appearance as a witness, a person whose conviction of a crime or civil adjudication has been expunged pursuant to this chapter may state that he or she has never been convicted of the crime or found to be a civil violator; provided, that, if the person is an applicant for a law enforcement agency position, for admission to the bar of any court, an applicant for a teaching certificate, under chapter 11 of title 16, a coaching certificate under §

16-11.1-1

, or the operator or employee of an early childhood education facility pursuant to chapter 48.1 of title 16, the person shall disclose the fact of a conviction or civil adjudication.

Whenever the records of any conviction or civil adjudication of an individual have been expunged under the provisions of this section, any custodian of the records of conviction or civil adjudication relating to that crime or violation shall not disclose the existence of the records upon inquiry from any source, unless the inquiry is that of the individual whose record was expunged, that of a bar admission, character and fitness, or disciplinary committee, board, or agency, or court which is considering a bar admission, character and fitness, or disciplinary matter, or that of the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, or that of any law enforcement agency when the nature and character of the offense in which an individual is to be charged would be affected by virtue of the person having been previously convicted or adjudicated of the same offense. The custodian of any records which have been expunged pursuant to the provisions of this section shall only release or allow access to those records for the purposes specified in this subsection or by order of a court.

The judiciary and its employees and agents are immune from any civil liability for any act of commission or omission, taken in good faith, arising out of and in the course of participation in, or assistance with the expungement procedures set forth in this section. This immunity shall be in addition to and not in limitation of any other immunity provided by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 8, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 8, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 234, art. 2, § 4, effective June 28, 2022.